test/src/morphology/N-aankar_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - ānkaŗ: # Noun 240 'eng anchor /est ankur/fin' - full paradigm
     ānkaŗ+N+Sg+Nom: ānkaŗ
     ānkaŗ+N+Sg+Gen: ānkaŗ
     ānkaŗ+N+Sg+Par: ānkaŗt
     ānkaŗ+N+Sg+Dat: ānkaŗõn
     ānkaŗ+N+Sg+Ins: ānkaŗõks
     ānkaŗ+N+Sg+Ill: ānkaŗõ
     ānkaŗ+N+Sg+Ela: ānkaŗšt
     ānkaŗ+N+Pl+Nom: ānkaŗd
     ānkaŗ+N+Pl+Gen: ānkaŗd
     ānkaŗ+N+Pl+Par: ānkaŗi
     ānkaŗ+N+Pl+Dat: ānkaŗdõn
     ānkaŗ+N+Pl+Ins: ānkaŗdõks
     ānkaŗ+N+Pl+Ill: ānkaŗiž
     ānkaŗ+N+Pl+Ela: ānkaŗist
